de: Rahmenmaterial des Rennkarts: Aluminium; Chrommolybdänstahl; Verbundwerkstoff; Stahl; Sonstige
pt-BR: Kart de corrida material do quadro: Alumínio; Aço cromo-molibdênio; Compósito; Aço; Outros
es: Material del chasis del kart de carreras: Aluminio; Acero cromolio; Compuesto; Acero; Otro
nl: Racekart frame materiaal: Aluminium; Chromolystaal; Composiet; Staal; Overig
sv: Racingkart – material för ram: Aluminium; Krommolybdenstål; Komposit; Stål; Övrigt
zh-TW: 賽車卡丁車車架材質: 鋁合金; 鉻鉬鋼; 複合材質; 鋼; 其他
vi: Vật liệu khung xe đua kart: Nhôm; Thép chromoly; Composite; Thép; Khác
ja: レーシングカートのフレーム素材: アルミニウム; クロモリ鋼; コンポジット; スチール; その他
cs: Materiál rámu závodní motokáry: Hliník; Chrommolybdenová ocel; Kompozit; Ocel; Ostatní
bg-BG: Материал на рамата на състезателния карт: Алуминий; Хром-молибденова стомана; Композитен материал; Стомана; Друго
sl-SI: Material okvirja dirkalnega gokarta: Aluminij; Krom-molibdenovo jeklo; Kompozit; Jeklo; Drugo
hr-HR: Materijal okvira za karting: Aluminij; Krom-molibden čelik; Kompozit; Čelik; Ostalo
ro-RO: Materialul cadrului de kart de curse: Aluminiu; Oțel crom-molibden; Compozit; Oțel; Altele
ko: 레이싱 카트 프레임 소재: 알루미늄; 크로몰리 강; 복합재; 강철; 기타
th: วัสดุ Frame รถโกคาร์ท: อะลูมิเนียม; เหล็กโครโมลี; คอมโพสิต; เหล็ก; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Materiál rámu pretekárskej motokáry: Hliník; Chrómmolybdénová oceľ; Kompozit; Oceľ; Iné
fr: Matériau du cadre du kart de course: Aluminium; Acier chromoly; Composite; Acier; Autre
pl: Materiał ramy gokarta wyścigowego: Aluminium; Stal chromowo-molibdenowa; Kompozyt; Stal; Inne
nb: Rammemateriale for racerkart: Aluminium; Krom-molybdenstål; Kompositt; Stål; Annet
el: Υλικό κατασκευής πλαισίου αγωνιστικού καρτ: Αλουμίνιο; Χρωμιομολυβδαινιούχος χάλυβας; Σύνθετο υλικό; Χάλυβας; Άλλο
da: Racerkarts chassismateriale: Aluminium; Krom-molybdæn-stål; Komposit; Stål; Andet
ru: Материал рамы гоночного карта: Алюминий; Хромомолибденовая сталь; Композит; Сталь; Другое
zh-CN: 竞技卡丁车车架材料: 铝; 铬钼钢; 复合材料; 钢; 其他
it: Materiale del frame del kart da corsa: Alluminio; Acciaio al cromo molibdeno; Materiale composito; Acciaio; Altro
tr: Yarış kartı şasi malzemesi: Alüminyum; Kromoli çelik; Kompozit; Çelik; Diğer
en: Racing kart frame material: Aluminum; Chromoly steel; Composite; Steel; Other
fi: Karting-kilpa-auton rungon materiaali: Alumiini; Kromimolybdeeniteräs; Komposiitti; Teräs; Muu
hu: Gokart vázanyaga: Alumínium; Króm-molibdén acél; Kompozit; Acél; Egyéb
pt-PT: Material do quadro do kart de corrida: Alumínio; Aço cromo-molibdénio; Compósito; Aço; Outro
lt-LT: Lenktyninio kartingo rėmo medžiaga: Aliuminis; Chromomolibdeninis plienas; Kompozitas; Plienas; Kita